Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-3702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act:

(1) Foreign corporation means a corporation incorporated under the laws of a jurisdiction outside of the United States that would be a business corporation if incorporated under the laws of this state. A corporation incorporated in any state or territory of the United States or territory of any Indian tribe of the United States is not a foreign corporation;

(2) Foreign government means a government other than the federal government of the United States, the government of any territory or possession of the United States, or the government of any state, political subdivision of a state, or Indian tribe;

(3) Indian tribe means an Indian tribe or band which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by the state;

(4) Nonresident alien means any human being who:

(a) Is not a citizen of the United States;

(b) Is not a national of the United States;

(c) Is not a lawful permanent resident of the United States; and

(d) Has not been physically present in the United States for at least one hundred eighty-three days during a three-year period that includes the current year and the two years immediately preceding the current year;

(5) Person means a human being, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity; and

(6) Restricted entity means:

(a) Any person identified on the sanctions lists maintained by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States Department of the Treasury as such sanctions lists existed on January 1, 2025; or

(b) Any person or foreign government determined by the United States Secretary of Commerce to have engaged in a long-term pattern or serious instances of conduct significantly adverse to the national security of the United States pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on February 7, 2025.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB7, § 2.